Washington statutes.
RCW 35.90.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Business licensing service," "business licensing system," and "business license" have the same meaning as in RCW 19.02.020.

(2) "City" means a city, town, or code city.

(3) "Department" means the department of revenue.

(4) "General business license" means a license, not including a regulatory license or a temporary license, that a city requires all or most businesses to obtain to conduct business within that city.

(5) "Partner" means the relationship between a city and the department under which general business licenses are issued and renewed through the business licensing service in accordance with chapter 19.02 RCW.

(6) "Regulatory business license" means a license, other than a general business license, required for certain types of businesses that a city has determined warrants additional regulation, such as taxicab or other for hire vehicle operators, adult entertainment businesses, amusement device operators, massage parlors, debt collectors, door-to-door sales persons, trade-show operators, and home-based businesses.

[ 2017 c 209 s 1.]